Texas, session 891, HB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter B, Chapter 11, Tax Code, is amended by adding Section 11.38 to read as follows: Sec. 11.38.  CERTAIN LAND IN PRIORITY GROUNDWATER MANAGEMENT AREA. (a)  In this section, "priority groundwater management area" has the meaning assigned by Section 35.002, Water Code. (b)  A person is entitled to an exemption from taxation of 35 percent of the appraised value of a tract of land the person owns that is: (1)  located in a priority groundwater management area; (2)  at least one-half acre in area, not including any portion of the tract underlying a structure; (3)  not irrigated; and (4)  not subject to appraisal under Subchapter C, D, E, or H, Chapter 23. SECTION 2.  Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, is amended to read as follows: (c)  An exemption provided by Section 11.13, 11.131, 11.132, 11.133, 11.134, 11.17, 11.18, 11.182, 11.1827, 11.183, 11.19, 11.20, 11.21, 11.22, 11.23(a), (h), (j), (j-1), or (m), 11.231, 11.254, 11.27, 11.271, 11.29, 11.30, 11.31, 11.315, 11.35, [or] 11.36, or 11.38, once allowed, need not be claimed in subsequent years, and except as otherwise provided by Subsection (e), the exemption applies to the property until it changes ownership or the person's qualification for the exemption changes. However, except as provided by Subsection (r), the chief appraiser may require a person allowed one of the exemptions in a prior year to file a new application to confirm the person's current qualification for the exemption by delivering a written notice that a new application is required, accompanied by an appropriate application form, to the person previously allowed the exemption. If the person previously allowed the exemption is 65 years of age or older, the chief appraiser may not cancel the exemption due to the person's failure to file the new application unless the chief appraiser complies with the requirements of Subsection (q), if applicable. SECTION 3.  This Act applies only to a tax year that begins on or after the effective date of this Act. SECTION 4.  It is the intent of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, that the amendments made by this Act to Section 11.43(c), Tax Code, be harmonized with another Act of the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, relating to nonsubstantive additions to and corrections in enacted codes. SECTION 5.  This Act takes effect January 1, 2026, but only if the constitutional amendment proposed by the 89th Legislature, Regular Session, 2025, to authorize the legislature to exempt from ad valorem taxation a portion of the appraised value of certain land that is located in a priority groundwater management area and is not irrigated is approved by the voters. If that amendment is not approved by the voters, this Act has no effect.